Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 20

Private Trust Companies

45-2-2001. Private trust company.

A private trust company acting as a fiduciary in this state is a company that does not transact a trust business with the general public. The company shall comply with this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, and the rules of this chapter and chapter 1 of this title applicable to a public trust company unless expressly exempted therefrom in writing by the commissioner pursuant to this part or by rule adopted by the department.

A private trust company or proposed private trust company may request in writing that it be exempted from any provision of the Banking Act or the rules thereof. The commissioner may grant the exemption in whole or in part if the commissioner finds that the private trust company does not and will not transact business with the general public.

As used in this part, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Collateral kinship” means a relationship that is not lineal, but stems from a common ancestor;

“Designated ancestor” means one (1) or more ancestors of the family designated as such in the application submitted under this part. A designated ancestor may be either living or deceased. If two (2) designated ancestors are designated, they must be or have been spouses to each other, and if more than such first two (2) designated ancestors are designated, each such additional designated ancestor must be or have been a spouse of either of the first two (2) designated ancestors;

“Family affiliate” means a company or other entity in which one (1) or more family members, directly or indirectly, through ownership of voting securities or equity, by contract, through power of direction, through beneficial or other ownership in one (1) or more other entities, or otherwise:

Owns a majority interest; or

May direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of the company or other entity, whether alone or in combination with others;

“Family client” means:

A family member;

An organization, foundation, or trust:

Whose primary purpose is not-for-profit or charitable, whether or not tax-qualified; and

Of which one (1) or more family clients is an organizer, incorporator, officer, member of the governing board, trustee, or donor, alone or in combination with other family clients, of a substantial portion of its assets;

The officers, directors, individual trustees and managers of the entity defined in subdivision (b)(2)(D)(ii), and their immediate family;

An estate of a family client;

An inter vivos or testamentary trust established by one (1) or more family clients, whether or not in combination with a third party;

An inter vivos or testamentary trust if the noncharitable beneficiaries with vested interests consist of one (1) or more family clients;

A family affiliate, its directors, officers, managers, or trustees and their immediate family;

A family services provider; and

A maximum of thirty-five (35) individuals designated by the private trust company if each individual is a full-time employee of a family affiliate. Any individual described in subdivisions (b)(2)(D)(i)-(viii) does not count against the maximum number of individuals established by this subdivision (b)(2)(D)(ix);

“Family member” means a designated ancestor and:

An individual within the twelfth degree of lineal kinship of a designated ancestor;

An individual within the eleventh degree of collateral kinship of a designated ancestor;

A spouse or former spouse of a designated ancestor or of an individual defined as a family member in subdivision (b)(2)(E)(i) or (ii); and

An individual who is a relative of a spouse or former spouse specified in subdivision (b)(2)(E)(iii) who is within the fifth degree of lineal or collateral kinship of the spouse or former spouse;

“Family services provider” means:

A full-time employee of the private trust company; or

A full-time employee of a family member providing personal services to the family member, including, but not limited to, household, legal, or accounting services;

“Foster child” means an individual raised or being raised by someone who is not the individual's natural or adoptive parent;

“Immediate family” means an individual's spouse or former spouse, any descendant of that individual, and any relative living in the same residence as that individual;

“Lineal kinship” means the direct ancestors and descendants of an individual; and

“Transact a trust business with the general public” means any sale, solicitation, arrangement, agreement, or transaction to provide fiduciary services as described in § 45-2-1002, whether or not for a fee, commission, or any other type of remuneration, with any client that is not a family client.

For purposes of this part:

A legally adopted person shall be treated as a natural child of the adoptive parents;

A stepchild shall be treated as a natural child of the individual who is or was the stepparent of that child;

A foster child, or an individual who was a minor when an adult became the individual's legal guardian, shall be treated as a natural child of the adult appointed as foster parent or guardian;

A child of a spouse or former spouse of an individual shall be treated as a natural child of that individual;

Degrees are calculated by adding the number of steps from a relevant designated ancestor through each individual to the family member either directly, in case of lineal kinship, or through a designated ancestor, in the case of collateral kinship; and

A person who was a family client at the time of becoming a client of the private trust company shall not cease to be a family client solely due to a death, divorce, retirement, or other similar event.

At the expense of the private trust company, the commissioner may examine or investigate the private trust company in connection with an application for exemption. Unless the application presents novel or unusual questions, the commissioner shall approve the application for exemption not later than the sixty-first day after the date the commissioner considers the application complete and accepted for filing. Otherwise, the application shall be deemed approved unless the commissioner extends the time for review by requiring the submission of additional information as considered necessary to an informed decision.

Any exemption granted under this section may be made subject to conditions or limitations imposed by the commissioner consistent with this chapter.

The department may adopt rules defining other circumstances that do not constitute transaction of business with the public, specifying the provisions of the Banking Act that are subject to an exemption request, and establishing procedures and requirements for obtaining, maintaining, or revoking exempt status.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 18; 2011, ch. 26, § 1; 2012, ch. 793, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 714, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 632, § 1; 2020, ch. 581, § 2.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted the former second sentence of (a), which read, “All individuals who control the private trust company, who establish trusts or charitable organizations controlling the private trust company, or who control corporations, sole proprietorships, partnerships, joint ventures, associations, trusts, estates, business trusts, limited liability companies, or other companies controlling the private trust company must be family members.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 581, § 4. March 19, 2020.

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

45-2-2002. Requirements to apply for and maintain status as a private trust company.

Application.

A private trust company requesting an exemption from provisions of the Banking Act shall file an application with the commissioner containing the following:

A nonrefundable application fee as set by the department;

A detailed statement under oath showing the private trust company's assets and liabilities as of the end of the month previous to the filing of the application;

A statement under oath of the reason for requesting the exemption;

A statement under oath that the private trust company is not currently transacting business with the public and that the company will not conduct business with the public without the prior written permission of the commissioner;

The current street mailing address and telephone number of the physical location in this state at which the private trust company will maintain its books and records, together with a statement under oath that the address given is true and correct and is not a United States postal service post office box or a private mail box, postal box, or mail drop;

A listing of the specific provisions for which the request for exemption is made; and

A statement under oath of the name of the individual who will be the designated ancestor of the private trust company.

The commissioner shall not approve a private trust company exemption unless the application is completed as required in this section.

Requirements. To maintain status as an exempt private trust company under this chapter, the private trust company shall comply with the following:

An exempt private trust company shall not transact business with the public;

An exempt private trust company shall file an annual certification that it is maintaining the conditions and limitations of its exempt status. This annual certification shall be filed on a form provided by the commissioner and be accompanied by a fee determined by the department. The annual certification shall be filed on or before June 30 of each year. The commissioner may examine or investigate the private trust company, at the company's expense, periodically as necessary to verify the certification; and

An exempt private trust company shall comply with the principal office provisions, address and telephone requirements of this section.

Change of Control.

Control of an exempt private trust company may not be transferred or sold with exempt status. In any change of control, the acquiring control person must comply with this chapter, and the exempt status of the private trust company shall automatically terminate upon the effective date of the transfer. A separate application for exempt status must be filed if the acquiring person wishes to obtain or continue an exemption pursuant to this section.

For the purposes of this part, a transfer of control of an exempt private trust company to a family member shall not be a change of control resulting in the termination of private trust company's exempt status regardless of whether the transfer is:

Direct or indirect;

Inter vivos; or

A result of death.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 18; 2012, ch. 793, §§ 3, 4.

45-2-2003. Remedies.

If a private trust company violates any provisions of this chapter, the commissioner may:

Institute any action or remedy prescribed by this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, or any applicable rule; or

Refer the private trust company to the attorney general and reporter for institution of a quo warranto proceeding to revoke the charter.

After notice and an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, the commissioner shall have authority to revoke the exempt status of a private trust company in the following circumstances:

The exempt private trust company makes a false statement under oath on any document required to be filed by the department;

The exempt private trust company fails to submit to an examination as required by this chapter;

The exempt private trust company withholds requested information from the commissioner; or

The exempt private trust company violates any provision applicable to exempt private trust companies.

After taking effect, the revocation is final and nonappealable as to that private trust company. The private trust company shall then be subject to all of the requirements and provisions applicable to non-exempt state trust companies within the period of time that the commissioner determines reasonable and circumstances warrant.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 18.

45-2-2004. Conversion to public trust company.

A private trust company may terminate its status as a private trust company and commence transacting business with the general public. A private trust company desiring to commence transacting business with the general public shall file a notice on a form prescribed by the commissioner, which shall set forth the name of the private trust company and an acknowledgment that any exemption granted or otherwise applicable to the private trust company shall cease to apply on the effective date of the notice, furnish a copy of the resolution adopted by the board authorizing the private trust company to commence transacting business with the general public, and pay the filing fee, if any, prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner may examine or investigate the private trust company, at the company's expense, in order to act on the notice.

The notificant may commence transacting business with the general public on the thirty-first day after the date the commissioner receives the notice, unless the commissioner specifies an earlier or later date.

The thirty-day period of review may be extended by the commissioner on determination that the written notice raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis. If the period for review is extended, the notificant may commence transacting business with the public only on prior written approval by the commissioner.

The commissioner may deny approval of the notice of the private trust company to commence transacting business with the general public if the commissioner finds that the notificant lacks sufficient financial resources to undertake the proposed expansion without adversely affecting its safety or soundness, or that the proposed transacting of business with the general public would be contrary to the public interest, or if the commissioner determines that the notificant will not within a reasonable period be in compliance with any provision from which the notificant had been previously exempted.

Upon the effective date of conversion, the private trust company shall then be subject to all of this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, and the rules thereof that are applicable to non-exempt state trust companies.

Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 18.

45-2-2005. Modification or revocation of exemption — Commissioner's authority — Notice — Hearing.

The commissioner shall not modify or revoke any exemption granted to a private trust company under § 45-2-2001 unless:

The commissioner determines that, based upon the safety and soundness of the private trust company or any action that the private trust company has taken or proposes to take, modification or revocation is necessary to protect the viability of the private trust company; or

The private trust company fails to comply with any conditions or limitations imposed by the commissioner in connection with granting the exemption.

The commissioner's authority to modify an exemption under subsection (a) includes the authority to impose conditions or limitations with respect to the exemption.

The commissioner must provide notice in writing to the private trust company at least thirty (30) days prior to the effective date of the proposed modification or revocation of an exemption.

Within thirty (30) days following receipt of the notice provided pursuant to subdivision (c)(1), the private trust company may request in writing that the commissioner hold a hearing for the private trust company to show cause as to why the proposed modification or revocation of an exemption should not become effective.

If a hearing is requested within the time period set forth in subdivision (c)(2), the commissioner shall schedule and conduct the hearing, and the proposed modification or revocation shall not become effective until the commissioner's final determination following the hearing.

If a hearing is not requested within the time period set forth in subdivision (c)(2), the proposed modification or revocation shall become effective without further notice or hearing on the date specified in the notice provided pursuant to subdivision (c)(1).

This section does not modify, limit, or repeal § 45-2-2003.

Acts 2018, ch. 632, § 2.